Hawaii statutes.
[§654-7] Judgment. The judgment shall
determine which party is entitled to the possession of the property and shall
designate the party's right therein and if the party has not the possession
thereof shall also determine the value of the right of the party. The court
may also award judgment for damages resulting from the detention of the
property. Any money judgment against any party shall also be against the
sureties on the party's bond. [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955, §244-27; HRS
§654-28; ren HRS §654-7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next